New Mexico, session 2026, SB69.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 66-3-10 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1978, Chapter 35, Section 30, as amended) is amended to read: "66-3-10. DEPARTMENT TO ISSUE CERTIFICATE OF TITLE, EVIDENCE OF REGISTRATION, REGISTRATION PLATE AND VALIDATION STICKER--RELEASE OF LIEN--ODOMETER STATEMENT.-- A. The department, upon registration of a vehicle, shall issue a certificate of title and evidence of registration; an odometer statement may appear on one or both of these documents. B. Except for certificates of title issued pursuant to Section 66-3-2, 66-3-27 or 66-3-423 NMSA 1978 and for manufactured homes, school buses, state government vehicles, motorcycles and off-highway motor vehicles, upon issuance of a new certificate of title or upon transfer of a certificate of title, the department shall issue [a] registration [plate] plates and [a] validation [sticker] stickers to the owner of the vehicle. C. The registration evidence shall be delivered to the owner and shall contain upon its face the date issued, the name and address of the owner, the registration number assigned to the owner and such description of the vehicle registered to the owner as determined by the secretary. D. The certificate of title shall contain the identical information required on the registration evidence and in addition a statement of the owner's title and of all liens and encumbrances upon the vehicle. E. The certificate of title shall contain a space for the release of any lien, space for assignment of title or interest and warranty by the owner and space for notation of liens and encumbrances upon the vehicle at the time of transfer. F. The certificate of title shall be delivered to the owner in the event no lien or encumbrances appear thereon, otherwise the certificate of title shall be delivered to the person named to receive it in the application for certificate. G. Whenever the owner of a vehicle subject to registration transfers the person's title or interest in the vehicle to a nonresident who desires to title the vehicle in the state of the nonresident's residence, the department upon receiving application and the payment of the proper fee shall issue a certificate of title only and record on the certificate all liens and encumbrances." SECTION 2. Section 66-3-14 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1978, Chapter 35, Section 34, as amended) is amended to read: "66-3-14. REGISTRATION PLATES OR VALIDATING STICKERS TO BE FURNISHED BY DEPARTMENT--REFLECTIVE MATERIAL.-- A. The department upon registering a vehicle shall issue [a] registration [plate] plates or [a] validating [sticker] stickers to the owner of the vehicle, except for a trailer, a tractor, a manufactured home, a motorcycle or an off-highway motor vehicle, for which the department shall issue one registration plate or validating sticker. The validating [sticker] stickers may be designed and required to be placed on the registration [plate] plates or elsewhere on the vehicle as prescribed by the department. B. Each registration plate shall have a background of reflective material such that the registration number assigned to the vehicle is plainly legible from a distance of one hundred feet at night. The colors shall include those of the state flag, except prestige and special plates. C. Each registration plate shall have displayed upon it: (1) the registration number assigned to the person to whom it was issued; and (2) the name of this state. D. The department shall issue no registration plates for privately owned vehicles that contain the words "staff officer" or any other title except as otherwise provided by law. E. All registration plates for private vehicles shall be alike in form except for the owner's registration number. The department shall adopt registration number systems for registration plates. F. In lieu of or in addition to [a] registration [plate or sticker] plates or stickers for commercial motor vehicles, the department may issue an electronic identifying device." SECTION 3. Section 66-3-17 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1978, Chapter 35, Section 37, as amended) is amended to read: "66-3-17. REGISTRATION PLATE--REPLACEMENT OF PLATE.-- A. Succeeding registration renewals of the registration [plate] plates issued under Section 66-3-14 NMSA 1978 shall cause the division to issue [a] validating [sticker] stickers only, except as provided in Subsections B and C of this section. B. The person to whom the [plate is] plates are issued may, at any time, apply for the issuance of [a] duplicate or replacement [plate] plates, and upon the surrender of the registration [plate he] plates the person then has, along with the payment of a reasonable fee set by the director that will cover the cost of the production and distribution of the [plate] plates, the applicant shall be issued [a] duplicate or replacement [plate] plates. C. Any peace officer may, upon discovering that [the] a registration plate of any vehicle is illegible because of wear or damage or other cause, issue a citation to the owner or operator of the vehicle. The citation shall provide that the owner shall, within thirty days from the date of the citation, apply for and obtain a duplicate or replacement plate from the division." SECTION 4. Section 66-3-18 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1978, Chapter 35, Section 38, as amended) is amended to read: "66-3-18. DISPLAY OF REGISTRATION PLATES AND TEMPORARY REGISTRATION PERMITS--DISPLAYS PROHIBITED AND ALLOWED.-- A. The registration [plate] plates shall be attached to the front and the rear of the vehicle for which [it is] the plates are issued, [however, the registration plate shall be attached to the front of a road tractor or truck tractor] except for a trailer, a tractor, a manufactured home, a motorcycle or an off-highway motor vehicle, in which case the registration plate shall be attached to the rear of the vehicle. The [plate] plates shall be securely fastened at all times in a fixed horizontal position at a height of not less than twelve inches from the ground, measuring from the bottom of the plate. [It] The plates shall be in a place and position so as to be clearly visible, and [it] the plates shall be maintained free from foreign material and in a condition to be clearly legible. B. A demonstration or temporary registration permit shall be firmly affixed to the inside left rear window of the vehicle to which it is issued, unless such display presents a safety hazard or the demonstration or temporary registration permit is not visible or readable from that position, in which case, the demonstration or temporary registration permit shall be displayed in such a manner that it is clearly visible from the rear or left side of the vehicle. C. No vehicle while being operated on the highways of this state shall have displayed either on the front or the rear of the vehicle any registration plate, including validating sticker, other than one issued or validated for the current registration period by the department or any other licensing authority having jurisdiction over the vehicle. No expired registration plate or validating sticker shall be displayed on the vehicle. [other than an expired special registration plate, which may be exhibited on the front of the vehicle D. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the use of a promotional or advertising plate on the front of the vehicle. E.] D. A violation of a provision of this section is a penalty assessment misdemeanor." SECTION 5. Section 66-3-19 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1978, Chapter 35, Section 39, as amended by Laws 1995, Chapter 44, Section 2 and also by Laws 1995, Chapter 135, Section 12) is amended to read: "66-3-19. RENEWAL OF REGISTRATION--STAGGERED PERIOD FOR VEHICLES--EXCEPTION FOR MANUFACTURED HOMES AND FREIGHT TRAILERS--LATE REGISTRATION.-- A. The department, in order to operate a more uniform system of vehicle registration, is authorized for certain or all vehicles to: (1) prorate registration fees by quarterly increments for periods in excess of twelve months, but not exceeding twenty-four months; (2) determine the specific registered vehicle owners and the numbers of these to be assigned to each registration period in order to maintain the system; (3) notify each registered vehicle owner by mail at the last known address within an appropriate period prior to the expiration of the current registration period. The notice shall include a renewal-of-registration application form specifying the amount of registration fees due and the specific dates of the registration period covered by the renewal application; (4) provide for the retention of registration plates; (5) provide for the issuance of validating stickers to be affixed either to retained registration plates or elsewhere on the vehicles as prescribed by the department to signify the registration of the vehicles for the current registration period; and (6) provide for identification purposes clearly recognizable distinctions between current and expired registration plates and validation stickers. To this end, the department, by whatever system or device the secretary may direct that is approved by the chief of the New Mexico state police division of the department of public safety, shall ensure a practicable display of the proper and current registration of vehicles. B. Certificates of title need not be renewed annually but shall remain valid until canceled by the department for cause or upon transfer of any interest shown in the certificate of title. C. The vehicle registration of vehicles registered under the provisions of Subsection A of this section expires on the last day of the period for which the vehicle has been registered. Every vehicle registration other than vehicles registered in accordance with Subsection A of this section, manufactured homes and freight trailers expires December 31. The department may receive applications for renewal of registration and may issue new registration evidence and registration plates or validating stickers at any time prior to expiration of the current registration. D. The registration of a manufactured home or freight trailer need not be renewed annually, and the initial registration shall be effective and considered a current registration for the purpose of the Motor Vehicle Code as long as the ownership of the vehicle is not transferred. The transfer of title provisions of the Motor Vehicle Code do apply to manufactured homes and freight trailers, and the transferee is required to register the vehicle in accordance with Section 66-3-103 NMSA 1978. The department is authorized and directed to issue distinctive registration plates for manufactured homes and freight trailers that identify the plates as permanent registration plates. E. It is unlawful to operate or transport or cause to be transported upon any highways in this state any vehicle, except a commercial motor vehicle registered in another state or a manufactured home, subject to registration under the provisions of the Motor Vehicle Code without having paid the registration fee or without having secured and constantly displayed the registration [plate] plates required by the Motor Vehicle Code. If a vehicle, other than a manufactured home, is operated or transported after the expiration of the vehicle registration, the owner of the vehicle is subject to a penalty of the greater of ten dollars ($10.00) or, if the vehicle is operated or transported thirty-one or more days after the expiration of the registration, an amount equal to seventy-five percent of the registration fee. Any duly appointed deputy or agent of the department has the authority to seize the vehicle and hold it until the fee, penalty and any fine that may be imposed for violation of law are paid and may sell the vehicle in the manner provided by law for the distraint and sale of personal property. F. It is unlawful to operate, transport or cause to be transported upon any highways in this state or to maintain in any place in this state a manufactured home subject to registration under the provisions of the Motor Vehicle Code without having paid the registration fee or without having secured and constantly displayed the registration plate required by the Motor Vehicle Code. Violation of this subsection subjects the owner to a penalty of five dollars ($5.00), and no other administrative penalty for failure to register under the Motor Vehicle Code shall be imposed upon manufactured homes that are subject to the provisions of Section 66-6-10 NMSA 1978. Any duly appointed deputy or agent of the department has authority to seize the manufactured home and hold it until the fee, penalties and any fine that may be imposed for violation of law are paid and may sell the manufactured home in the manner provided by law for the distraint and sale of personal property. G. This section authorizes a staggered system of registration of vehicles." SECTION 6. Section 66-3-104 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1978, Chapter 35, Section 51, as amended) is amended to read: "66-3-104. USE OF PLATE AND REGISTRATION NUMBER ON ANOTHER VEHICLE--TRANSFER OF REGISTRATION.-- A. When the owner of a registered vehicle assigns title or interest to the vehicle, the registration of that vehicle expires, unless the vehicle is registered for an extended registration period and the owner applies to have the registration number assigned to another vehicle as provided in Subsection B of this section. B. When the owner of a registered vehicle assigns title or interest to the vehicle, [he] the owner shall remove and retain the registration [plate] plates from the vehicle and, within thirty days of the transfer, either make application to have the registration number assigned to another vehicle of the same class or forward the [plate] plates to the department or its authorized agent to be destroyed. The transfer of the registration [plate] plates shall be permitted only if the application for transfer is made in the name of the original registered owner unless the owner's name has been changed by marriage, divorce or court order. C. The registration [plate] plates shall not be displayed upon the newly acquired vehicle until the registration of the vehicle has been completed and a new registration certificate issued. However, the temporary retail-sale permit issued for the vehicle by the dealer pursuant to the provisions of Section 66-3-6 NMSA 1978 may be securely attached to the [plate] plates to be transferred and displayed in accordance with Subsection A of Section 66-3-18 NMSA 1978." SECTION 7. Section 66-3-406 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1978, Chapter 35, Section 85, as amended) is amended to read: "66-3-406. SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATES FOR PRIVATE VEHICLES.-- A. Upon compliance with all laws relating to registration and licensing of motor vehicles and upon application to the division, special registration plates shall be furnished for vehicles owned by: (1) elected state officials; (2) members of the legislature; (3) the chief clerks of the house of representatives and of the senate; (4) the sergeants at arms of the house of representatives and of the senate; and (5) disabled persons, pursuant to Section 66-3-16 NMSA 1978. B. Special registration plates furnished under this section shall identify the officials, members and disabled persons as such. If legislators, the special registration plates shall indicate whether they are members of the house of representatives or of the senate. C. When the ownership of the vehicle for which [a] special registration [plate has] plates have been furnished by the division changes or the holder ceases to qualify, the special registration [plate] plates shall immediately be removed from the vehicle by the holder of the special registration [plate] plates and returned to the director, at which time the person removing the special registration [plate] plates shall receive [a] regular registration [plate] plates for the vehicle. D. The holder of [a] special registration [plate] plates may transfer [his] the special registration [plate] plates from one vehicle to another during the year in which the [plate is] plates are valid upon application to the director for the transfer. If a transfer is made, the owner of the vehicle from which the special registration [plate is] plates are removed may receive [a] regular registration [plate] plates upon payment of the fees established by law. E. The holder of [a] special registration [plate] plates pursuant to Paragraph (2) of Subsection A of this section may simultaneously hold a regular registration for the same vehicle. The division shall, by rule, provide for maintenance of simultaneous registration records." SECTION 8. Section 66-3-407 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1978, Chapter 35, Section 86) is amended to read: "66-3-407. SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATES FOR PRIVATE VEHICLES USED IN PUBLIC SERVICE.-- A. Upon compliance with all laws relating to registration and licensing of motor vehicles and upon application to the division and the payment of necessary fees, special registration plates shall be furnished for motor vehicles owned by members of an organized group committed under its charter or bylaws to perform such services as are reasonably related to the public safety or welfare. B. Special [license] registration plates furnished under this section shall identify the members as belonging to the particular unit and shall be of such design, and cost such additional fee of not less than fifteen dollars ($15.00), as the division in its discretion may provide. C. At the time of delivery of the special [plate] registration plates, the member shall surrender [his] the member's current registration [plate] plates issued for the motor vehicle if any [has] have been issued. D. Each member shall only be entitled to one set of special [plate] registration plates, and when the ownership of the motor vehicle for which the [plate has] plates have been furnished by the division changes or the owner ceases to be a member of the organization, the special [plate] registration plates shall immediately be removed from the vehicle by the holder of the special [plate] registration plates and returned to the director, at which time [it] the special registration plates shall be exchanged for [a] regular registration [plate] plates. E. The holder of [a] special [plate] registration plates may transfer [his] the holder's special [plate] registration plates from one vehicle to another during the year in which the [plate is] plates are valid upon application to the director for transfer. If [such] a transfer is made, the owner of the vehicle from which the [plate is] plates are removed may not receive [a] regular registration [plate] plates except upon payment of the fees established by law." SECTION 9. Section 66-3-407.1 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1989, Chapter 87, Section 1) is amended to read: "66-3-407.1. SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATES.--Any person who is entitled to [a] special registration [plate] plates, as provided for in Sections 66-3-405 through 66-3-407 NMSA 1978, and subsequently fails to qualify for such [a] special registration [plate] plates shall remove the special registration [plate] plates no later than January 1 of the year following the year in which the person failed to qualify for the special registration [plate] plates." SECTION 10. EFFECTIVE DATE.--The effective date of the provisions of this act is January 1, 2027. - 16 -